Maryland, session 2025, SB0443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–106.
(t) A prosecution for an offense under [§ 5–140, § 5–141,] § 5–141 or § 5–144 of
the Public Safety Article, relating to straw sales of regulated firearms to prohibited persons
or minors and to illegal sales, rentals, transfers, possession, or receipt of regulated firearms,
shall be instituted within 3 years after the offense was committed.
Article – Public Safety
5–140.
(a) A dealer or other person may not transport a regulated firearm into the State
for the purpose of unlawfully selling or trafficking of the regulated firearm.
– 1 –

Ch. 465 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) A person who violates this section is guilty of a [misdemeanor] FELONY and
on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding
$25,000 or both.
(c) Each violation of this section is a separate crime.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –